Utah statutes.
13-42-121.   Required language.
Unless the administrator, by rule, provides otherwise, the disclosures and
documents required by this chapter must be in English.  If a provider
communicates with an individual primarily in a language other than English,
the provider must furnish a translation into the other language of the
disclosures and documents required by this chapter.
